Massachusetts, session 194th, H5456.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 1 of Chapter 305 of the Acts of 2016 is hereby amended by
inserting the following words after the word “units”:- and year-round ownership opportunities.
SECTION 2. Section 2(a) of said Chapter 305 is hereby amended by inserting the
following words after the word “trustees” :- and two alternates.
SECTION 3. Section 5 of said Chapter 305 is hereby amended by inserting the following
word after the word “rental” :- or ownership.
SECTION 4. Upon the effective date of this Act, the Year-Round Market Rate Rental
Housing Trust Fund shall be known as the Year-Round Market Rate Housing Trust Fund.
SECTION 5. This Act shall take effect upon passage.
of 1